Maryland, session 2026, SB0885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–1501.
(b) There is a Small, Minority, and Women–Owned Businesses Account under the
authority of the Department.
(c) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under [§ 9–1A–27] §§
9–1A–27 AND 9–1F–05 of the State Government Article.
Article – Education

SENATE BILL 885 3
5–206.
(b) There is the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue distributed to the Fund under Title 9, Subtitles 1D [and 1E]
THROUGH 1F of the State Government Article and §§ 2–4A–02, 2–605.1, and 2–1303 of
the Tax – General Article;
(2) Money appropriated in the State budget for the Fund;
(3) Interest earned by the Academic Excellence Fund established under §
6–1105 of this article; and
(4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
5–235.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
subsection (o) of this section and beginning in fiscal year 2023, the county governing body
shall levy and appropriate an annual tax sufficient to provide an amount of revenue for
elementary and secondary public education purposes equal to the local share of major
education aid as adjusted under § 5–239 of this subtitle.
(ii) For the purposes of calculating the local share of major education
aid and regardless of the source of the funds, all funds that a county board, including the
Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners, is authorized to expend for schools may be
considered as levied by the county council, board of county commissioners, or the Mayor
and City Council of Baltimore except for:
1. State appropriations;
2. Federal education aid payments; and
3. The amount of the expenditure authorized for debt service
and capital outlay.
(2) Subject to PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND subsection (o)
of this section and except as provided in subsection (a–1) of this section, the county
governing body shall appropriate local funds to the school operating budget in an amount
no less than the product of the county’s enrollment count for the current fiscal year and the
local appropriation on a per pupil basis for the prior fiscal year using enrollment count.

SENATE BILL 885
(3) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE COUNTY GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
(I) SUBTRACT THE AMOUNT OF INTERNET GAMING PROCEEDS
DISTRIBUTED TO LOCAL JURISDICTIONS FOR EDUCATION FUNDING UNDER §
9–1F–05(B)(2)(VIII) OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE FROM THE TOTAL
AMOUNTS CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) APPROPRIATE TO THE SCHOOL OPERATING BUDGET THE
AMOUNT OF INTERNET GAMING PROCEEDS THAT THE COUNTY GOVERNING BODY
RECEIVED.
Article – Labor and Employment
8–803.
(d) (1) Except as provided in § 8–1207 of this title for the work sharing
program and § 8–1604 of this title for the Self–Employment Assistance Program, an eligible
claimant shall be paid a weekly benefit amount that is computed by:
(i) determining the claimant’s weekly benefit amount under this
section;
(ii) adding any allowance for a dependent to which the claimant is
entitled under § 8–804 of this subtitle; and
(iii) subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) of this
subsection, subtracting any wages exceeding $50 payable to the claimant for the week.
(2) In computing benefits under this subsection, a fraction of a dollar shall
be rounded to the next lower dollar.
(3) A payment to an individual as compensation for serving as an election
judge for a local board of elections in the State may not be included when computing the
wages required to be subtracted under paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection.
(4) A PAYMENT TO A FORMER VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEE
FROM THE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEE DISPLACEMENT FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1F–13 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT
BE INCLUDED WHEN COMPUTING THE WAGES REQUIRED TO BE SUBTRACTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – State Government
9–1A–28.

SENATE BILL 885 5
(a) There is a Purse Dedication Account under the authority of the State Racing
Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under § 9–1A–27 of this
subtitle AND § 9–1F–05 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1A–29.
(a) There is a Racetrack Facility Renewal Account under the authority of the
State Racing Commission.
(b) (1) The Account shall receive money as required under:
(I) § 9–1A–27 of this subtitle for the first 16 years of operations at
each video lottery facility; AND
(II) § 9–1F–05 OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 1F. INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO.
9–1F–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BINGO PROCEEDS” MEANS THE TOTAL RECEIPTS FROM THE
OPERATION OF ONLINE BINGO LESS THE AMOUNT OF MONEY WINNINGS OR PRIZES
PAID OUT TO PLAYERS.
(C) “COMMERCIAL BINGO OPERATOR” MEANS THE HOLDER OF A LICENSE
TO OPERATE ELECTRONIC BINGO MACHINES IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 13 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE FOR COMMERCIAL PURPOSES.
(D) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
COMMISSION.
(E) “ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED AREA” MEANS A GEOGRAPHIC AREA
IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION THAT MEETS THREE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING
CRITERIA:
(1) HAS A MEDIAN INCOME RATE THAT IS 80% OR LESS OF THE
AVERAGE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED;

SENATE BILL 885
(2) HAS AN UNEMPLOYMENT RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE
UNEMPLOYMENT RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS
LOCATED;
(3) HAS AN UNINSURED RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE HEALTH
UNINSURED RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS
LOCATED;
(4) HAS A SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
PARTICIPATION RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM PARTICIPATION RATE OF THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED; AND
(5) HAS A POVERTY RATE THAT IS AT LEAST 150% OF THE POVERTY
RATE IN THE STATE WITHIN WHICH THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED.
(F) “GAMING PROCEEDS” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF MONEY BET ON
INTERNET GAMING, LESS:
(1) THE AMOUNT RETURNED TO SUCCESSFUL PLAYERS;
(2) THE CASH EQUIVALENTS OF ANY MERCHANDISE OR THING OF
VALUE AWARDED AS A PRIZE TO SUCCESSFUL PLAYERS; AND
(3) THROUGH THE FIRST 5 YEARS OF OPERATION OF AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSEE:
(I) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S PROCEEDS DO NOT
EXCEED $4,000,000 DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR OF OPERATION,
35% OF FREE PLAY AND PROMOTIONAL CREDITS REDEEMED BY PLAYERS;
(II) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S PROCEEDS ARE AT
LEAST $4,000,000 BUT DO NOT EXCEED $8,000,000 DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR OF OPERATION, 31.25% OF FREE PLAY AND PROMOTIONAL
CREDITS REDEEMED BY PLAYERS;
(III) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S PROCEEDS ARE AT
LEAST $8,000,000 BUT DO NOT EXCEED $10,000,000 DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR OF OPERATION, 27.5% OF FREE PLAY AND PROMOTIONAL
CREDITS REDEEMED BY PLAYERS;
(IV) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S PROCEEDS ARE AT
LEAST $10,000,000 BUT DO NOT EXCEED $12,000,000 DURING THE IMMEDIATELY

SENATE BILL 885 7
PRECEDING YEAR OF OPERATION, 23.75% OF FREE PLAY AND PROMOTIONAL
CREDITS REDEEMED BY PLAYERS; OR
(V) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S PROCEEDS EXCEED
$12,000,000 DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR OF OPERATION, 20% OF
FREE PLAY AND PROMOTIONAL CREDITS REDEEMED BY PLAYERS.
(G) “INTERNET GAMING” MEANS CASINO–STYLE GAMING THROUGH AN
ONLINE GAMING SYSTEM:
(1) ON A COMPUTER, A MOBILE DEVICE, OR ANY OTHER INTERACTIVE
DEVICE; AND
(2) THAT IS CONDUCTED BY AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR A
PERSON WHO OPERATES INTERNET GAMING ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSEE.
(H) “INTERNET GAMING LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
COMMISSION TO CONDUCT INTERNET GAMING IN THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
(I) “INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE” MEANS THE HOLDER OF AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) “MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–1E–01 OF THIS TITLE.
(K) “ONLINE BINGO” MEANS ONLINE OPERATION OF ELECTRONIC INSTANT
BINGO.
(L) “ONLINE BINGO LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
COMMISSION TO CONDUCT ONLINE BINGO IN THE STATE.
(M) “ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE” MEANS THE HOLDER OF AN ONLINE BINGO
LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(N) “ONLINE GAMING OPERATOR” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT HOLDS A
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO:
(1) CONDUCT AND OPERATE INTERNET GAMING ON BEHALF OF AN
INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE; OR
(2) CONDUCT AND OPERATE ONLINE BINGO ON BEHALF OF AN ONLINE
BINGO LICENSEE.

SENATE BILL 885
(O) (1) “PERSONAL NET WORTH” MEANS THE NET VALUE OF THE ASSETS
HELD BY AN INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S SHARE OF ASSETS HELD
JOINTLY OR AS COMMUNITY PROPERTY WITH THE INDIVIDUAL’S SPOUSE, AFTER
TOTAL LIABILITIES ARE DEDUCTED.
(2) “PERSONAL NET WORTH” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN AN APPLICANT
FOR LICENSURE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL’S EQUITY IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S PRIMARY
PLACE OF RESIDENCE;
(III) ANY MORTGAGE OR LOAN SECURED BY THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PRIMARY PLACE OF RESIDENCE AS A LIABILITY; OR
(IV) THE CASH VALUE OF ANY QUALIFIED RETIREMENT SAVINGS
PLANS OR INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ACCOUNTS.
(P) “SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANT” MEANS AN APPLICANT FOR AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSE WHO SATISFIES AT LEAST TWO OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(1) LIVED IN AN ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED AREA FOR AT
LEAST 5 OF THE 10 YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE SUBMISSION OF THE
APPLICATION;
(2) ATTENDED A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN AN ECONOMICALLY
DISADVANTAGED AREA FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS;
(3) FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS, ATTENDED A 4–YEAR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE WHERE AT LEAST 40% OF THE INDIVIDUALS WHO
ATTEND THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION ARE ELIGIBLE FOR A PELL
GRANT; AND
(4) HAS A PERSONAL NET WORTH THAT DOES NOT EXCEED AN
AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION TO ENCOURAGE DIVERSITY, EQUITY,
AND INCLUSION IN THE INTERNET GAMING INDUSTRY.
(Q) “SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–1E–01 OF THIS TITLE.
(R) “SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–1E–01 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 885 9
(S) “VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–1A–01
OF THIS TITLE.
(T) “VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–1A–01
OF THIS TITLE.
9–1F–02.
(A) (1) THIS SUBTITLE AUTHORIZES:
(I) AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE TO CONDUCT AND
OPERATE INTERNET GAMING IN THE STATE AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE TO CONDUCT AND OPERATE
ONLINE BINGO IN THE STATE AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE
MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH UP TO ONE ONLINE GAMING OPERATOR.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION
SHALL REGULATE INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO AND THE CONDUCT OF
INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT THE
COMMISSION REGULATES THE OPERATION OF VIDEO LOTTERY TERMINALS AND
TABLE GAMES UNDER SUBTITLE 1A OF THIS TITLE, MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING
UNDER SUBTITLE 1E OF THIS TITLE, AND ELECTRONIC BINGO MACHINES
CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 12 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(C) UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER §§ 9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18,
9–1A–19, 9–1A–20, AND 9–1A–25 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO THE AUTHORITY, DUTIES,
AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE COMMISSION, AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE, AN
ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE, AND AN EMPLOYEE OR A CONTRACTOR OF AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL BE LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) A PERSON THAT CONDUCTS INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE
BINGO;
(II) A PERSON THAT CONDUCTS INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE
BINGO ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR AN ONLINE BINGO
LICENSEE, INCLUDING AN ONLINE GAMING OPERATOR;

SENATE BILL 885
(III) A LIVE STUDIO DEALER, AS DEFINED UNDER § 9–1F–10 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) A PERSON NOT LICENSED UNDER ITEM (I), (II), OR (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH THAT MANAGES, OPERATES, SUPPLIES, PROVIDES SECURITY FOR,
OR PROVIDES SERVICE, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIRS FOR AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSEE OR AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE; AND
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL DIRECTLY EMPLOYED IN THE OPERATION
OF INTERNET GAMING BY AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO BY AN
ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE IF THE INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT OTHERWISE HOLD A VALID
LICENSE UNDER SUBTITLE 1A OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY BY REGULATION REQUIRE A PERSON THAT
CONTRACTS WITH A LICENSEE AND THE PERSON’S EMPLOYEES TO OBTAIN A
LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE
LICENSING REQUIREMENTS ARE NECESSARY IN ORDER TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC
INTEREST AND ACCOMPLISH THE POLICIES ESTABLISHED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSION MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO A PERSON
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
APPLICANT OR ANY OF THE APPLICANT’S AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER
COMMON CONTROL, IS KNOWINGLY ACCEPTING REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM:
(I) A JURISDICTION ON THE BLACK LIST OF MONEY
LAUNDERING COUNTRIES ESTABLISHED BY THE FINANCIAL ACTION TASK FORCE;
(II) A JURISDICTION DESIGNATED AS A STATE SPONSOR OF
TERRORISM BY THE UNITED STATES; OR
(III) ILLEGAL GAMBLING ACTIVITY IN THE UNITED STATES.
(2) IF AT ANY TIME DURING THE LICENSURE OF A PERSON DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SECTION THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES THAT THE LICENSE HOLDER OR ANY OF THE LICENSE HOLDER’S
AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER COMMON CONTROL, IS KNOWINGLY
ACCEPTING REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM A
JURISDICTION OR ACTIVITY DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY REVOKE THE LICENSE OF THE LICENSE
HOLDER IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT, AFTER NOTICE AND

SENATE BILL 885 11
OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, IT WOULD FURTHER THE PUBLIC INTEREST TO
DISCONTINUE THE OPERATIONS OF THE LICENSE HOLDER WITHIN THE STATE.
(3) (I) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
2. “ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET” MEANS A
JURISDICTION IN WHICH INTERACTIVE GAMING IS PROHIBITED BY THE LAWS OF
THAT JURISDICTION.
3. “INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT” MEANS HARDWARE,
SOFTWARE, APPLICATIONS, AND SERVERS USED TO OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR OFFER
INTERACTIVE GAMBLING GAMES.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE A PERSON DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OR (IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON APPLICATION FOR
A LICENSE AND ANNUALLY FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE, TO SUBMIT A
DISCLOSURE STATING THE JURISDICTIONS IN WHICH THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE
HOLDER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER, DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
ACCEPTED REVENUE FROM THE SUPPLY OF INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT IN AN
ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET.
(III) A MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION OR OMISSION ON THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY, AT
THE DISCRETION OF THE COMMISSION, RESULT IN THE DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION
FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR, IN THE CASE OF A LICENSE HOLDER,
DISCIPLINARY ACTION, INCLUDING A SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE LICENSE
AND PENALTIES FOR OFFICERS OR BOARD MEMBERS OF THE LICENSE HOLDER.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH:
(1) THE FORM AND CONTENT OF AN APPLICATION FOR ANY LICENSE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) STANDARDS, PROCEDURES, AND RULES THAT GOVERN THE
CONDUCT AND OPERATION OF INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO; AND
(3) ANY OTHER REGULATION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1F–03.

SENATE BILL 885
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THIS SUBTITLE BE
IMPLEMENTED IN A MANNER THAT, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY STATE AND
FEDERAL LAW, MAXIMIZES THE ABILITY OF MINORITIES, WOMEN, AND
MINORITY– AND WOMEN–OWNED BUSINESSES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE INTERNET
GAMING INDUSTRY, INCLUDING THROUGH THE OWNERSHIP OF ENTITIES LICENSED
TO CONDUCT INTERNET GAMING.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION MAY ISSUE AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE TO:
1. A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR;
2. A SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE WHO IS BOTH A
SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE AND A MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSEE IF BOTH LICENSES WERE ISSUED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026;
AND
3. APPLICANTS THAT:
A. HAVE MAINTAINED THE APPLICANTS’
HEADQUARTERS IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 10 YEARS;
B. EMPLOYED ON DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND CONTINUE
TO EMPLOY, AT LEAST 250 EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE ON A FULL–TIME OR
FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT BASIS;
C. DURING THE PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2018,
AND ENDING DECEMBER 31, 2025, FILED AN APPLICATION OR RENEWAL
APPLICATION TO OWN AN EQUITY INTEREST OF AT LEAST 5% IN A VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR AND WERE FOUND BY THE COMMISSION TO BE QUALIFIED;
D. AGREE TO OPERATE THE INTERNET GAMING
BUSINESS USING A BRAND ASSOCIATED WITH A MARYLAND–BASED APPLICANT,
SUBJECT TO WAIVER BY THE COMMISSION AFTER 1 FULL YEAR OF OPERATION; AND
E. COMMIT TO SPEND AT LEAST $5,000,000 DURING THE
INITIAL TERM OF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSE TO BUILD AND OPERATE A LIVE
GAMING STUDIO, AS DEFINED UNDER § 9–1F–10 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR A STUDIO
FOR TELEVISION AND FILM PRODUCTIONS UNDER THE AUSPICES OF THE
MARYLAND FILM OFFICE WITHIN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
DIVISION OF TOURISM, FILM, AND THE ARTS.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN APPLICANT THAT HOLDS MORE THAN ONE LICENSE UNDER

SENATE BILL 885 13
SUBTITLE 1A OR SUBTITLE 1E OF THIS TITLE MAY APPLY ONLY FOR A SINGLE
LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) 1. THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE TO AN APPLICANT
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 AND 2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH AN
ADDITIONAL INTERNET GAMING LICENSE IF, AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OR 2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE APPLICANT
CONCURRENTLY APPLIES FOR A LICENSE THAT THE APPLICANT AGREES TO
OPERATE IN PARTNERSHIP WITH SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANTS WHO DEMONSTRATE
DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP OF AT LEAST 33% IN A JOINT VENTURE.
2. IF AN APPLICANT APPLIES FOR A LICENSE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION MAY ISSUE THE APPLICANT AN ADDITIONAL LICENSE THAT THE
APPLICANT MAY OPERATE SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) 1. IF A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR OR SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE THAT IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FAILS TO APPLY FOR A LICENSE
FOR WHICH THE ENTITY IS POTENTIALLY ELIGIBLE, INCLUDING THE ADDITIONAL
LICENSES DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION MAY ISSUE THE OTHERWISE AVAILABLE INTERNET GAMING LICENSES
THROUGH TWO COMPETITIVE LICENSING ROUNDS TO APPLICANTS THAT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
2. IN ADDITION TO THE LICENSES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE FIVE
INTERNET GAMING LICENSES THROUGH TWO COMPETITIVE LICENSING ROUNDS TO
APPLICANTS THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
3. THE FIRST ROUND OF APPLICATIONS FOR LICENSES
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 1 AND 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL
BE AVAILABLE TO APPLICANTS THAT DEMONSTRATE DIRECT OR INDIRECT
OWNERSHIP OF AT LEAST 33% BY SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANTS.
4. IF ANY LICENSES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 1 AND 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH REMAIN AVAILABLE AFTER
THE FIRST ROUND OF APPLICATIONS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 3 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE REMAINING LICENSES SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO
APPLICANTS WHO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (V) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.

SENATE BILL 885
(V) 1. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO AN
APPLICANT DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 AND 2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO AN
APPLICANT THAT HAS NOT DEMONSTRATED DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP OF
AT LEAST 5% BY INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANTS.
3. THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE A LICENSE TO AN
APPLICANT THAT, IN LIEU OF THE OWNERSHIP REQUIREMENT DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, HAS ESTABLISHED A
PROFIT–SHARING AGREEMENT WITH NONMANAGEMENT EMPLOYEES WHO WOULD
OTHERWISE QUALIFY AS SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANTS.
(VI) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW EACH APPLICATION FOR
AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION TO ENSURE THAT
APPLICANTS SATISFY THE SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANT OWNERSHIP REQUIREMENTS
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(VII) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FACTORS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION BY REGULATION TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW APPLICATIONS FOR INTERNET GAMING LICENSES
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BASED ON:
1. THE PERCENTAGE OF OWNERSHIP BY INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE SOCIAL EQUITY APPLICANTS;
2. THE APPLICANT’S FINANCIAL STABILITY,
RESOURCES, INTEGRITY, AND BUSINESS ABILITY AND ACUMEN;
3. THE APPLICANT’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
PLANS FOR INTERNET GAMING INDUSTRY EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE;
4. THE APPLICANT’S PLANS FOR EMPLOYING
INDIVIDUALS IN THE INTERNET GAMING INDUSTRY WHO RESIDE IN ECONOMICALLY
DISADVANTAGED AREAS; AND
5. THE APPLICANT’S RESPONSIBLE GAMING PROGRAMS
AND AN EFFECTIVE GOVERNANCE AND COMPLIANCE PROGRAM.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSE
TO A COMMERCIAL BINGO OPERATOR.

SENATE BILL 885 15
(II) A COMMERCIAL BINGO OPERATOR THAT APPLIES FOR AN
ONLINE BINGO LICENSE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT APPLY FOR AN
INTERNET GAMING LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW EACH APPLICATION FOR
AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT WITH A CONSULTANT TO
ASSIST THE COMMISSION WITH THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSE APPLICATION AND THE REVIEW OF APPLICANTS.
(II) AS PART OF THE REVIEW OF AN APPLICATION FOR AN
INTERNET GAMING LICENSE, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE
ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE TO THE APPLICANT SERVES THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(4) (I) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE INITIAL LICENSE FEE FOR AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE IS
EQUAL TO:
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM B OF THIS
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH, $1,000,000; OR
B. $500,000 IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE
AGREES WITH THE COMMISSION TO OFFER ONLY LIVE DEALER GAMES CONDUCTED
BY THE LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–10 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2. THE INITIAL LICENSE FEE FOR AN ONLINE BINGO
LICENSE IS EQUAL TO $500,000.
(II) 1. IN THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, “MAJOR MINORITY–OWNED
APPLICANT OR JOINT VENTURE APPLICANT” MEANS AN APPLICANT FOR AN
INTERNET GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IN WHICH:
A. ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SOCIAL EQUITY
APPLICANTS OR ENTITIES CERTIFIED AS MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES UNDER
TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWN AT LEAST 51% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE
APPLICANT; OR
B. IN THE CASE OF A JOINT VENTURE, ONE OR MORE
ENTITIES DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM A OF THIS SUBSUBPARAGRAPH DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY OWN AT LEAST 51% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE JOINT VENTURE.

SENATE BILL 885
2. THE INITIAL LICENSE FEE FOR AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSE ISSUED TO A MAJOR MINORITY–OWNED APPLICANT OR JOINT VENTURE
APPLICANT SHALL BE:
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM B OF THIS
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH, $500,000; OR
B. $250,000, IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE
AGREES WITH THE COMMISSION TO OFFER ONLY LIVE DEALER GAMES CONDUCTED
BY THE LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–10 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3. THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
A. ESTABLISH PROCEDURES AND STANDARDS FOR
DETERMINING WHETHER AN APPLICANT QUALIFIES AS A MAJOR MINORITY–OWNED
APPLICANT OR JOINT VENTURE APPLICANT UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
B. ENSURE THAT THE REDUCED LICENSE FEE PROVIDED
UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS AVAILABLE ONLY TO
APPLICANTS THAT MAINTAIN THE OWNERSHIP STRUCTURE REQUIRED FOR AT
LEAST THE INITIAL TERM OF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSE.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE THE PAYMENT OF THE
FEE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPHS (I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN
SEPARATE INSTALLMENTS.
(IV) THE TERM OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE AND AN
ONLINE BINGO LICENSE IS 5 YEARS.
(5) (I) ON APPLICATION BY AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR
AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE AND PAYMENT OF A LICENSE RENEWAL FEE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL RENEW FOR 5
YEARS AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSE IF THE LICENSEE
COMPLIES WITH ALL STATUTORY AND REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS.
(II) THE LICENSE RENEWAL FEE IS EQUAL TO:
1. IN THE CASE OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE, 1%
OF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE’S AVERAGE ANNUAL PROCEEDS RETAINED BY
THE LICENSEE UNDER § 9–1F–05(B)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE PRECEDING
3–YEAR PERIOD; OR

SENATE BILL 885 17
2. IN THE CASE OF AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSE, 1% OF
THE ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE’S AVERAGE ANNUAL BINGO PROCEEDS RETAINED BY
THE LICENSEE UNDER § 9–1F–05(C)(1)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE PRECEDING
3–YEAR PERIOD.
(C) ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL PREPARED BY THE
COMMISSION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS FROM
THE LICENSE FEES COLLECTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AN AMOUNT TO THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
AGENCY NECESSARY TO REIMBURSE THE AGENCY FOR EXPENSES RELATED TO THE
ISSUANCE AND RENEWAL OF LICENSES UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) 1% TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) THE REMAINDER TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) FOR ALL LICENSES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION AND § 9–1F–02 OF
THIS SUBTITLE FOR AN ONLINE GAMING OPERATOR, IF AN APPLICANT HOLDS A
VALID GAMING OR GAMING OPERATION LICENSE IN THIS STATE OR AT LEAST THREE
OTHER STATES AND THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE LICENSING
STANDARDS OF THE ISSUING AGENCY ARE COMPREHENSIVE AND THOROUGH AND
PROVIDE SIMILAR AND ADEQUATE SAFEGUARDS TO THOSE PROVIDED IN THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY:
(1) WAIVE SOME OR ALL OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(2) ISSUE A LICENSE TO THAT APPLICANT.
(E) (1) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSE, THE LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION A DIVERSITY PLAN THAT DESCRIBES THE STEPS THAT THE LICENSEE
WILL TAKE TO PROMOTE MEANINGFUL DIVERSITY AMONG ITS OWNERS, INVESTORS,
MANAGERS, EMPLOYEES, AND CONTRACTORS AND TO PROMOTE EQUALITY OF
OPPORTUNITY.
(2) EACH INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE AND ONLINE BINGO
LICENSEE SHALL MAKE GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO MEET THE DIVERSITY OBJECTIVES
OUTLINED IN THE DIVERSITY PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ANY NECESSARY METRICS TO
MEASURE PROGRESS IN MEETING THOSE OBJECTIVES.

SENATE BILL 885
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY MAKE THE DIVERSITY PLANS AND
METRICS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE
PUBLIC.
(F) (1) AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE
MAY NOT TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL OF THE LICENSE FOR A PERIOD OF
AT LEAST 3 YEARS FOLLOWING ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE.
(2) THE LIMITATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO
TRANSFERS AS A RESULT OF THE DISABILITY, INCAPACITY, OR DEATH OF THE
OWNER OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSE,
BANKRUPTCY OR RECEIVERSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH A LENDING AGREEMENT OF
AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE, OR COURT ORDER.
9–1F–04.
(A) EACH INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE AND ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE:
(1) SHALL:
(I) COMPLY WITH ALL STATE AND FEDERAL DATA PRIVACY AND
SECURITY LAWS;
(II) MAINTAIN ALL INTERNET GAMING DATA AND ONLINE BINGO
DATA SECURELY FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS;
(III) AUTHORIZE ONLY INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE AT LEAST 21
YEARS OF AGE TO ENGAGE IN INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO; AND
(IV) VERIFY AN INDIVIDUAL’S AGE AND IDENTITY AT THE TIME
THE INDIVIDUAL ESTABLISHES AN INTERNET GAMING ACCOUNT OR ONLINE BINGO
ACCOUNT AND PERIODICALLY REVERIFY THE INDIVIDUAL’S IDENTITY; AND
(2) MAY NOT:
(I) SHARE ANY PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
WITH ANY THIRD PARTIES WITHOUT PERMISSION, EXCEPT AS NEEDED TO OPERATE
INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO, ADMINISTER THE LICENSEE’S OBLIGATIONS
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, AND SUPPORT PROBLEM GAMBLING INITIATIVES;
(II) TARGET ADVERTISING TO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
PROHIBITED FROM PARTICIPATING IN GAMBLING ACTIVITIES UNDER THIS TITLE
AND OTHER AT–RISK INDIVIDUALS; OR

SENATE BILL 885 19
(III) ENGAGE IN ANY FALSE OR DECEPTIVE ADVERTISING.
(B) (1) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE SHALL COMPLY WITH THE
STATE’S MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE, SHALL
ESTABLISH A CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND APPROPRIATE MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE
PROCUREMENT OF GOODS AND SERVICES RELATED TO INTERNET GAMING.
(II) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND
PROCEDURES SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
BASED ON THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT
SUBTITLE.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE, AN INTERNET
GAMING LICENSEE, OR AN ENTITY THAT OPERATES A LIVE DEALER STUDIO ON
BEHALF OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE SHALL PRODUCE INFORMATION,
DOCUMENTATION, AND ASSURANCES TO ESTABLISH BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING
EVIDENCE THAT:
(1) UNLESS THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO
OPERATOR ALREADY HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, THE
APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO OPERATOR HAS ENTERED INTO A
LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT WITH EACH LABOR ORGANIZATION THAT IS ACTIVELY
ENGAGED IN REPRESENTING OR ATTEMPTING TO REPRESENT INTERNET GAMING
INDUSTRY WORKERS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING DEALERS CONDUCTING LIVE
DEALER GAMES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–10 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT IS VALID AND ENFORCEABLE
UNDER 29 U.S.C. § 158;

SENATE BILL 885
(3) THE LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT PROTECTS THE STATE’S
REVENUES BY PROHIBITING THE LABOR ORGANIZATION AND ITS MEMBERS FROM
ENGAGING IN PICKETING, WORK STOPPAGES, BOYCOTTS, AND ANY OTHER
ECONOMIC INTERFERENCE WITH THE OPERATION OF INTERNET GAMING WITHIN
THE FIRST 5 YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSE;
AND
(4) THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR LIVE DEALER STUDIO OPERATOR
INTENDS TO MAINTAIN A NEUTRAL POSITION ON THE UNIONIZATION OF ANY
EMPLOYEES OF THE APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR OPERATOR, INCLUDING BY
REFRAINING FROM MAKING ANY STATEMENT OR IMPLICATION THAT THE
APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR OPERATOR:
(I) OPPOSES THE SELECTION OR DESELECTION OF A
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGENT; OR
(II) SUPPORTS OR OPPOSES THE SELECTION OF A PARTICULAR
LABOR ORGANIZATION AS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGENT.
9–1F–05.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCOUNT TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR
ALL OF THE REVENUE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE GAMING PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET GAMING, LESS THE
AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, SHALL BE UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE COMPTROLLER AND
DISTRIBUTED AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE BINGO PROCEEDS FROM ONLINE BINGO, LESS THE AMOUNT
RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION,
SHALL BE UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE COMPTROLLER AND DISTRIBUTED AS
PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ALL GAMING PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET GAMING SHALL BE
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSFERRED DAILY INTO THE STATE LOTTERY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN:
1. 80% OF THE GAMING PROCEEDS FROM LIVE DEALER
GAMES CONDUCTED BY THE LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–10 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND

SENATE BILL 885 21
2. 60% OF THE GAMING PROCEEDS RECEIVED BY THE
LICENSEE FROM ALL OTHER INTERNET GAMING.
(2) ALL GAMING PROCEEDS FROM INTERNET GAMING IN THE STATE
LOTTERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED ON A MONTHLY BASIS, ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL
PREPARED BY THE COMMISSION IN THE FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) FOR THE FIRST 12 MONTHS THAT INTERNET GAMING IS IN
OPERATION IN THE STATE, UP TO $10,000,000 TO THE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY
EMPLOYEE DISPLACEMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1F–13 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) TO JURISDICTIONS WITH VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITIES
BASED ON EACH JURISDICTION’S PERCENTAGE OF OVERALL GROSS REVENUES
FROM VIDEO LOTTERY TERMINALS FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED UNDER §
9–1A–31(B) OF THIS TITLE:
1. $6,500,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. $8,300,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029;
3. $10,000,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030;
4. $11,300,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2031; AND
5. $11,400,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2032;
(III) TO THE PURSE DEDICATION ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–28 OF THIS TITLE:
1. $4,900,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. $6,300,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029;
3. $7,600,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030;
4. $8,600,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2031; AND
5. $8,700,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2032;
(IV) TO THE RACETRACK FACILITY RENEWAL ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–29 OF THIS TITLE:

SENATE BILL 885
1. $900,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. $1,000,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029;
3. $1,200,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030; AND
4. $700,000 IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2031 AND 2032;
(V) TO THE SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN–OWNED
BUSINESSES ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1501 OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE:
1. $1,300,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. $1,600,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029;
3. $1,900,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030; AND
4. $2,200,000 IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2031 AND 2032;
(VI) 1% OF ALL GAMING PROCEEDS TO THE STATE LOTTERY AND
GAMING CONTROL AGENCY FOR THE COST OF PERFORMING BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATIONS AND OTHER REGULATORY ACTIVITIES;
(VII) 1% OF ALL GAMING PROCEEDS TO THE PROBLEM
GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE;
(VIII) 5% OF ALL GAMING PROCEEDS TO COUNTY GOVERNING
BODIES, DISTRIBUTED TO EACH COUNTY BASED ON THE COUNTY’S CURRENT FISCAL
YEAR ENROLLMENT COUNT, AS DEFINED IN § 5–201 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE,
TO BE USED TO ASSIST COUNTIES IN MEETING THEIR EDUCATION FUNDING
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–235(A) OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(IX) THE REMAINDER TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(C) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ALL BINGO PROCEEDS FROM ONLINE BINGO SHALL BE
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSFERRED DAILY INTO THE STATE LOTTERY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN 60% OF THE
BINGO PROCEEDS RECEIVED BY THE LICENSEE FROM ONLINE BINGO.

SENATE BILL 885 23
(2) ALL BINGO PROCEEDS FROM ONLINE BINGO IN THE STATE
LOTTERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED ON A MONTHLY BASIS, ON A PROPERLY APPROVED TRANSMITTAL
PREPARED BY THE COMMISSION IN THE FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) 1% OF ALL BINGO PROCEEDS TO THE STATE LOTTERY AND
GAMING CONTROL AGENCY FOR THE COST OF PERFORMING BACKGROUND
INVESTIGATIONS AND OTHER REGULATORY ACTIVITIES;
(II) 1% OF ALL BINGO PROCEEDS TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(III) THE REMAINDER TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
9–1F–06.
(A) IN ORDER TO ASSIST INDIVIDUALS WHO MAY HAVE A GAMBLING
PROBLEM, EACH INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE AND ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE
SHALL:
(1) CAUSE THE WORDS “IF YOU OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW HAS A
GAMBLING PROBLEM AND WANTS HELP, CALL 1–800–GAMBLER” OR SOME
COMPARABLE LANGUAGE APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION TO BE DISPLAYED
PROMINENTLY AT LOG–ON AND LOG–OFF TIMES TO ANY INDIVIDUAL VISITING OR
LOGGED ONTO AN INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO PLATFORM;
(2) REQUIRE AN INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO ACCOUNT
HOLDER TO ESTABLISH A LIMIT ON THE AMOUNT OF MONEY DEPOSITED WITHIN A
SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME AND THE LENGTH OF TIME THE ACCOUNT HOLDER WILL
BE UNABLE TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO AND MAKE
ADDITIONAL DEPOSITS IF THE ACCOUNT HOLDER REACHES THE ESTABLISHED
DEPOSIT LIMIT;
(3) PROVIDE A MECHANISM BY WHICH AN INTERNET GAMING OR
ONLINE BINGO ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY ESTABLISH A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF
INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO ACTIVITY THROUGH THE ACCOUNT FOR ANY
NUMBER OF HOURS OR DAYS;
(4) PROHIBIT THE USE OF CREDIT CARDS FOR ANY INTERNET
GAMING–RELATED OR ONLINE BINGO–RELATED TRANSACTIONS; AND

SENATE BILL 885
(5) (I) CAUSE THE DISPLAY OF A PROBLEM GAMBLING
DISCLOSURE CONCERNING THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH GAMBLING AND THE
SUPPORT AVAILABLE TO PROBLEM GAMBLERS AT ACCOUNT LOGIN;
(II) REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO CERTIFY THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM
BEFORE ESTABLISHING AN INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO ACCOUNT; AND
(III) REQUIRE EACH USER TO CERTIFY ON A MONTHLY BASIS
THAT THE USER HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
ITEM.
(B) IF A SUSPENSION OF INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO ACTIVITY
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION IS IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER
FOR AT LEAST 72 HOURS, THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO
LICENSEE MAY NOT SEND GAMING–RELATED E–MAIL TO THE ACCOUNT HOLDER
UNTIL THE SUSPENSION EXPIRES.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EACH INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE AND ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE
A MECHANISM BY WHICH AN ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY PERIODICALLY CHANGE THE
CONTROLS ON GAMING ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) IF THE ACCOUNT IS SUSPENDED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY NOT
CHANGE GAMING CONTROLS UNTIL THE SUSPENSION EXPIRES.
(3) IF AN ACCOUNT HOLDER SEEKS TO INCREASE THE LIMIT ON THE
AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY DEPOSIT WITHIN A PERIOD
OF TIME SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE INTERNET
GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE MAY NOT REFLECT THE INCREASED
LIMIT FOR AT LEAST 24 HOURS.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF INTERNET GAMING
OR ONLINE BINGO ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY AN ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY CONTINUE TO HAVE ACCESS
TO THE ACCOUNT AND IS AUTHORIZED TO WITHDRAW FUNDS FROM THE ACCOUNT
ON PROPER APPLICATION TO THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO
LICENSEE.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE
INTENDED TO REDUCE OR MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF PROBLEM GAMBLING.

SENATE BILL 885 25
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE ESTABLISHMENT OF A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WITH GAMBLING PROBLEMS WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE
EXCLUDED FROM ANY INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO ACTIVITY LICENSED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) PROVIDE A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
SOBER AND INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
(3) UNLESS AN INDIVIDUAL REQUESTING PLACEMENT ON THE
VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES THE PROVISION OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE MARYLAND CENTER OF
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER FOR THE PURPOSE OF
PROVIDING THE INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND CONFIDENTIAL
RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
(4) AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE:
(I) MAY NOT PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY
EXCLUSION LIST TO ESTABLISH AN INTERNET GAMING ACCOUNT OR ONLINE BINGO
ACCOUNT OR ENGAGE IN INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO; AND
(II) MAY PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY
EXCLUSION LIST WHO PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED AN INTERNET GAMING ACCOUNT
OR ONLINE BINGO ACCOUNT TO ACCESS THE ACCOUNT ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
VIEWING AND DOWNLOADING THE INDIVIDUAL’S TRANSACTION HISTORY.
(5) THE COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE SANCTIONS ON A LICENSEE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF THE LICENSEE KNOWINGLY FAILS TO
EXCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST FROM ENGAGING IN
INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO.
(F) AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR, EACH INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE AND
ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE SHALL REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF PLAYERS THAT THE INTERNET GAMING
LICENSEE OR ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE HAS IDENTIFIED AS ENGAGING IN ERRATIC
OR INCREASED GAMBLING BEHAVIOR; AND
(2) THE NUMBER AND LENGTH OF ANY BANS OR SUSPENSIONS IN
RESPONSE TO THE BEHAVIOR DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 885
9–1F–07.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000,000
AGAINST ANY PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY:
(1) TAMPERS WITH SOFTWARE, COMPUTERS, OR OTHER EQUIPMENT
USED TO CONDUCT INTERNET GAMING OR ONLINE BINGO TO ALTER THE ODDS OR
THE PAYOUT OF A GAME OR DISABLE THE GAME FROM OPERATING ACCORDING TO
THE RULES OF THE GAME AS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION; OR
(2) OFFERS OR ALLOWS TO BE OFFERED ANY INTERNET GAME OR
ONLINE BINGO THAT HAS BEEN TAMPERED WITH IN A WAY THAT AFFECTS THE ODDS
OR THE PAYOUT OF A GAME OR HAS BEEN DISABLED FROM OPERATING ACCORDING
TO THE RULES OF THE GAME AS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY SUSPEND, FOR NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS, THE
LICENSE OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE, AN ONLINE BINGO LICENSEE, OR ANY
OTHER PERSON REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE WHO IS IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
9–1F–08.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE MARYLAND CENTER OF
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE IMPACT OF INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO ON
PROBLEM GAMBLERS AND GAMBLING ADDICTION IN THE STATE; AND
(2) THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
CONTROLS IN PLACE TO ENSURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF MEASURES TO PROTECT
VULNERABLE AND PROBLEM GAMBLERS.
9–1F–09.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE ALL TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS RELATED TO
INTERNET GAMING CONDUCTED IN THE STATE AND ACQUIRED BY AN OPERATOR OF
THE LICENSEE ON A MONTHLY, QUARTERLY, OR ANNUAL BASIS TO MORGAN STATE
UNIVERSITY AND BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY.

SENATE BILL 885 27
(B) THE TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL EXCLUDE ANY PERSONALLY
IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.
9–1F–10.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAME” MEANS ANY
INTERNET–BASED VERSION, OR SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENT, OF A TABLE GAME,
POKER TOURNAMENT, GAMING TOURNAMENT, OR ANY OTHER GAME TYPICALLY
OFFERED IN A CASINO AND APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING GAMES IN
WHICH INDIVIDUALS WAGER MONEY OR SOMETHING OF MONETARY VALUE AND
THAT ARE ACCESSED BY A COMPUTER OR MOBILE DEVICE THAT IS CONNECTED TO
THE INTERNET.
(3) (I) “LIVE DEALER GAME” MEANS AN AUTHORIZED
INTERACTIVE GAME CONDUCTED BY LIVE STUDIO DEALERS OR OTHER PHYSICAL
GAMING EQUIPMENT, SUCH AS AN AUTOMATED ROULETTE WHEEL, BALL BLOWER,
OR GAMING DEVICE, OR BOTH, IN A LIVE GAME ENVIRONMENT IN WHICH THE
AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS HAVE THE ABILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN GAMEPLAY AND
COMMUNICATE GAME DECISIONS THROUGH AN AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAMING
PLATFORM.
(II) “LIVE DEALER GAME” INCLUDES A LIVE CARD GAME, A LIVE
TABLE GAME, AND ANY OTHER LIVE AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAME.
(4) “LIVE GAMING STUDIO” MEANS A PHYSICAL LOCATION IN THE
STATE THAT UTILIZES LIVE VIDEO STREAMING TECHNOLOGY TO PROVIDE
AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAMES TO A PLAYER’S INTERACTIVE GAMING DEVICE OR
MULTI–USE COMPUTING DEVICE.
(5) “LIVE STUDIO DEALER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) LEADS A TABLE GAME, INCLUDING BLACKJACK, CRAPS,
POKER, ROULETTE, OR ANY OTHER AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAME, WHILE
ASSISTING AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS WITH GAME–RELATED NEEDS;
(II) DISTRIBUTES VIRTUAL CARDS, DICE, OR OTHER
EQUIPMENT TO AUTHORIZED PARTICIPANTS ACCORDING TO THE TABLE GAME OR
AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAME; AND
(III) MONITORS GAME PACE AND PLAY.

SENATE BILL 885
(B) SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION, AN INTERNET GAMING
LICENSEE MAY OFFER AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAMES, INCLUDING GAMING
TOURNAMENTS IN WHICH PLAYERS COMPETE AGAINST ONE ANOTHER IN ONE OR
MORE OF THE GAMES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR BY THE COMMISSION
OR IN APPROVED VARIATIONS OR COMPOSITES OF THOSE GAMES.
(C) AN ONLINE GAMING OPERATOR THAT CONDUCTS AND OPERATES
INTERNET GAMING ON BEHALF OF AN INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE MAY USE LIVE
STUDIO DEALERS TO ADMINISTER AN AUTHORIZED INTERACTIVE GAME.
(D) A LIVE GAMING STUDIO USED TO CONDUCT A LIVE DEALER GAME
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE LOCATED WITHIN THE STATE; AND
(2) IF THE INTERNET GAMING LICENSEE IS A VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR, SHALL BE LOCATED WITHIN THE COUNTY WITHIN WHICH THE VIDEO
LOTTERY FACILITY IS LOCATED.
9–1F–11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GOVERNMENT” MEANS ANY GOVERNMENTAL UNIT,
OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT, OF A NATIONAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
BODY EXERCISING GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTIONS.
(B) ON RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSION, THE GOVERNOR, ON
BEHALF OF THE STATE, IS AUTHORIZED TO:
(1) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTS,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, THAT ALLOWS AND PROVIDES FOR
PARTICIPATION IN MULTIJURISDICTIONAL INTERNET GAMING BY INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN JURISDICTIONS OVER WHICH THE
GOVERNMENTS THAT ARE A PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT EXERCISE LEGAL
AUTHORITY; AND
(2) TAKE ALL NECESSARY ACTIONS TO ENSURE THAT ANY
AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO UNDER THIS SECTION BECOMES EFFECTIVE.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT PROVIDE FOR:
(1) THE FORM, LENGTH, AND TERMS OF AN AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION;

SENATE BILL 885 29
(2) MATTERS RELATING TO THE TAXATION OF INTERNET GAMING
REVENUE BY THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(3) THE SHARING AND DISTRIBUTION OF INTERNET GAMING
REVENUE AMONG THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(4) RESOLUTION OF PLAYER DISPUTES;
(5) THE INFORMATION THAT A GOVERNMENT PROPOSING TO ENTER
INTO THE AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE MUST PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION;
(6) THE MANNER AND PROCEDURE FOR HEARINGS CONDUCTED BY
THE COMMISSION WITH RESPECT TO ANY AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(7) THE INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE GOVERNOR THAT SUPPORTS THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMISSION
MADE UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(8) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS THE AGREEMENT INCLUDES TERMS:
(1) FOR ANY POTENTIAL ARRANGEMENT FOR THE SHARING OF
REVENUES BY THE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(2) PERMITTING THE EFFECTIVE REGULATION OF INTERNET GAMING
BY THE STATE, INCLUDING PROVISIONS RELATING TO LICENSING, TECHNICAL
STANDARDS TO BE FOLLOWED, RESOLUTION OF DISPUTES BY PATRONS,
REQUIREMENTS FOR BANKROLLS, ENFORCEMENT, ACCOUNTING, AND
MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS;
(3) BY WHICH EACH PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT AGREES TO PROHIBIT
OPERATORS OF INTERNET GAMING, SERVICE PROVIDERS, AND MANUFACTURERS OR
DISTRIBUTORS OF INTERNET GAMING SYSTEMS FROM ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIVITY
PERMITTED UNDER THE AGREEMENT UNLESS THOSE PERSONS ARE LICENSED OR
FOUND SUITABLE:
(I) UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR

SENATE BILL 885
(II) BY ANY OTHER PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT UNDER
REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE MATERIALLY CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) PROHIBITING VARIATION OR DEROGATION FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE AGREEMENT FOR ANY PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT ABSENT
THE CONSENT OF ALL PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT;
(5) PROHIBITING ANY SUBORDINATE OR SIDE AGREEMENTS, EXCEPT
WITH RESPECT TO SHARING OF REVENUES, AMONG ANY SUBSET OF THE
GOVERNMENTS THAT ARE PARTIES TO THE AGREEMENT; AND
(6) IF THE AGREEMENT ALLOWS PERSONS PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN
THE STATE TO PARTICIPATE IN INTERNET GAMING CONDUCTED BY ANOTHER PARTY
TO THE AGREEMENT OR AN OPERATOR OF INTERNET GAMING LICENSED BY THE
OTHER PARTY, REQUIRING THAT PARTY TO ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN REGULATORY
REQUIREMENTS GOVERNING INTERNET GAMING THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE IN ALL MATERIAL RESPECTS.
9–1F–12.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE OPERATION OF INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO IN
THE STATE; AND
(2) THE IMPACT OF INTERNET GAMING AND ONLINE BINGO ON VIDEO
LOTTERY FACILITIES, OTHER GAMING VENUES, AND ANCILLARY BUSINESSES THAT
SURROUND THOSE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITIES AND GAMING VENUES.
9–1F–13.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY
EMPLOYEE DISPLACEMENT FUND.
(B) THERE IS A VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEE DISPLACEMENT
FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY
EMPLOYEES WHO ARE DISPLACED BY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF INTERNET GAMING.
(D) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE

SENATE BILL 885 31
FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 9–1F–05(B)(2)(I)
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES RELATED TO ADMINISTRATION
OF THE FUND;
(2) FOR GRANTS TO FORMER VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEES
DISPLACED BY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF INTERNET GAMING TO OFFSET ANY
REDUCTION IN THE TAKE–HOME PAY OF THE FORMER EMPLOYEES;
(3) TO SUPPLEMENT UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PAYMENTS
RECEIVED BY FORMER VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEES DISPLACED BY THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF INTERNET GAMING;
(4) TO ESTABLISH JOB TRAINING PROGRAMS FOR FORMER VIDEO
LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEES DISPLACED BY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
INTERNET GAMING; AND
(5) FOR ANY OTHER PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR TO ASSIST FORMER VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY EMPLOYEES
DISPLACED BY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF INTERNET GAMING.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.

SENATE BILL 885
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 5–235(a) of the Education
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, may not be construed to reduce overall funding
appropriated by a county governing body based on that section of law as it existed before
the enactment of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In accordance with Article XIX, § 1(e) of the Maryland Constitution, before
this Act, which authorizes additional forms or expansion of commercial gaming, becomes
effective, a question substantially similar to the following shall be submitted to a
referendum of the qualified voters of the State at the general election to be held in
November 2026:
“Do you favor the expansion of commercial gaming in the State of Maryland to
authorize Internet gaming and online bingo for the primary purpose of raising revenue for
education?”
(b) The State Board of Elections shall do those things necessary and proper to
provide for and hold the referendum required by this section. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “For the referred law”, this Act shall become effective on the 30th day
following the official canvass of votes for the referendum, but if a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “Against the referred law”, this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 3 of this Act and for the sole purpose of providing for the referendum required by
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.